Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 4 House of Representatives

Cross references. —

As to each house of legislature choosing its officers, see art. 3, § 10, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies § 56.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 41, 61.

§ 28-4-101.
Initial calling of house to order; election of temporary speaker.

Upon the assemblage of the state legislature upon the first day of each regular session thereof, it shall be the duty of the secretary of state to call the house of representatives to order at twelve (12:00) o’clock noon, calling the roll of members entitled to seats according to the certificate of the state canvassing board, filed in the office of secretary of state, whereupon it shall be his duty to call for the nomination and election of a temporary speaker, upon the election of whom the secretary of state shall forthwith surrender his place to the duly elected temporary presiding officer.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 17; C.S. 1920, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 64-301; C.S. 1945, § 17-301; W.S. 1957, § 28-27.

§ 28-4-102.
Speaker; speaker pro tem.

There shall be a speaker of the house who shall take the chair at the hour fixed for the meeting of the house, and call the members to order, and shall perform the following duties:

To announce the business before the house in the order in which it is to be taken up;

To receive and submit, in proper manner, all motions and propositions presented by the members, and to announce the result;

To receive messages and other communications from other branches of the government, and announce them to the house;

To authenticate by his signature, when necessary, all bills, orders and proceedings of the house;

To name the members of all committees, unless otherwise directed by the house.

He may call any member to the chair, but such substitution shall not extend beyond an adjournment.

He shall have the regulation of such parts of the capitol and its passages, and any building in which the legislature meets while displaced from the capitol, as are or may be set apart for the use of the house or its officers.

He shall refer all matters to be committed to the committee most appropriate to take charge of the same.

He shall call a member to fill the chair whenever the house resolves itself into a committee of the whole.

He shall preserve order and decorum, and may speak to points of order in preference to other members, rising from his seat for that purpose.

When the house is in a committee of the whole, should there be any disorderly conduct in the lobby, or any part of the house, the speaker shall immediately resume the chair, and shall have the power to order the house cleared until order is restored.

The house shall elect a speaker pro tem, who, in the absence of the speaker, shall exercise all the powers and authority of the speaker, and shall perform all his duties.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 1, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 21; C.S. 1910, § 18; C.S. 1920, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 64-302; C.S. 1945, § 17-302; W.S. 1957, § 28-28; 2016 ch. 50, § 1, effective March 4, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to authority for additional compensation of president of senate and speaker of house, see §

28-5-103

.

As to requirement that presiding officer of each house shall sign all bills and joint resolutions, see art. 3, § 28, Wyo. Const.

As to when speaker shall act as governor during vacancy in office, see §

9-1-211

.

The 2016 amendment,

inserted “and any building in which the legislature meets while displaced from the capitol” following “its passages” in (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 50 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 28-4-103.
Employees generally.

At the beginning of each session of the legislature, the house of representatives thereof shall engage such employee personnel for said session, upon respective compensation bases, as decided by it.

The house may authorize personnel to be employed beyond the adjournment of the session in order to complete recordkeeping of each session and prepare for each session of the legislature. The speaker of the house, subject to legislative appropriation, shall establish the compensation of any staff so employed whose duties shall be performed under the direction of the speaker.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 113, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 64-303; C.S. 1945, § 17-303; Laws 1947, ch. 58, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 28-29; 2017 ch. 173, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to authority to hire additional employees when necessary, see §

28-1-103

.

The 2017 amendment

added the designation to present (a) and added (b).

Laws 2017, ch. 173, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 6, 2017.

§ 28-4-104.
Chief clerk.

There shall be a chief clerk whose duties shall be as follows:

To keep a correct journal of the proceedings of the house;

To read aloud all papers handed to him for that purpose by any member;

To certify to, and transmit to the senate, all bills, resolutions and other papers requiring the concurrence of the senate, immediately after their passage;

To notify the senate on the concurrence or disagreement by the house in any vote of the senate;

To permit no papers or records belonging to the house to be taken out of his custody otherwise than in the regular course of business;

To perform all other duties pertaining to his office under the direction of the speaker.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 1, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 23; C.S. 1910, § 22; C.S. 1920, § 25; R.S. 1931, § 64-305; C.S. 1945, § 17-305; W.S. 1957, § 28-30.

Cross references. —

As to duty to send copies of printed bills to county clerks, see § 28-1-104.

As to duty to issue certificate of attendance and mileage to members of legislature, see § 28-5-104.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the 1890-91 printed act.